Utah statutes.
31A-2-304.   Auxiliary procedural powers.

The commissioner, or his delegate authorized for a particular matter over his handwritten signature, may administer oaths, take testimony, issue subpoenas, and take depositions in connection with any hearing, meeting, examination, investigation, or other proceeding that the commissioner may conduct.  The subpoena shall have the same effect and shall be served in the same manner as if issued from a court of record.  Sections 78B-1-131 and 78B-6-313 apply to the enforcement of the process issued by the commissioner or his delegate.

